Hawaii statutes.
[§346-378] Housing first programs.
(a) The department of human services, in consultation with the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development, as necessary, shall implement
housing first programs and services, as the department deems appropriate for
clientele who would most likely benefit from and succeed with the
implementation of housing first programs and services, and subject to the
availability of existing funds or housing first special fund moneys.

(b) The principles of housing first include:

(1) Moving chronically homeless individuals into
housing directly from streets and shelters, without a precondition of accepting
or complying with treatment; provided that the department may condition
continued tenancy through a housing first program on participation in treatment
services;

(2) Providing robust support services for program
participants, predicated on assertive engagement instead of coercion;

(3) Granting chronically homeless individuals
priority as program participants in housing first programs;

(4) Embracing a harm-reduction approach to
addictions, rather than mandating abstinence, while supporting
program-participant commitments to recovery; and

(5) Providing program-participants with leases and
tenant protections as provided by law.

The department of human services may contract
with housing first consultants to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(c) Housing first programs shall incorporate
the following:

(1) Identification of target populations,
specifically chronically homeless individuals;

(2) Developing assessments for the chronically
homeless population;

(3) Developing service components, including:

(A) Financial assistance;

(B) In-home case management services;

(C) Affordable housing requirements;

(D) Landlord cultivation;

(E) Housing-placement requirements; and

(F) Support services to move
program-participants toward self-sufficiency.

(d) The department of human services shall
submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to
the convening of each regular session, beginning with the regular session of
2011. The annual report shall include:

(1) The total number of participants in housing first
programs;

(2) The annual costs of the programs;

(3) The types of support services offered; and

(4) Information regarding the duration of services
required for each participant.

(e) As used in this section, "chronically
homeless individual" means a homeless individual who has an addiction or a
mental illness, or both. [L 2010, c 212, pt of §2, §5]

Revision Note

In subsections (a), (b), and (d), "the department of
human services" was substituted for "the Hawaii public housing
authority, in collaboration with the department of human services"
pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next